Utah statutes.
58-72-201.   Acupuncture Licensing Board.

(1)  There is created an Acupuncture Licensing Board consisting of:

(a)  four licensed acupuncturists;

(b)  one physician with knowledge of and experience in acupuncture; and

(c)  one member from the general public.

(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3) (a)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.

(b)  In addition, the board shall designate one of its members on a permanent rotating basis to:

(i)  assist the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or unprofessional conduct of a licensee; and

(ii)  advise the division in its investigation of these complaints.

(4)  A board member who has, under Subsection (3), reviewed a complaint or advised in its investigation may be disqualified from participating with the board when the board serves as a presiding officer in an adjudicative proceeding concerning the complaint.

